Nebraska, session 109, LB1163.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1163 LB1163
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-3206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-3206 (1)(a) For qualifying property other than single-family
residential property, any annual assessment imposed on such qualifying
property that becomes delinquent, including any interest on the annual
assessment and any penalty, shall constitute a PACE lien against the
qualifying property on which the annual assessment is imposed until the
annual assessment, including any interest and penalty, is paid in full.
Any annual assessment that is not paid within the time period set forth
in the assessment contract shall be considered delinquent. The
municipality shall, within fourteen days after an annual assessment
becomes delinquent or, if there is a third-party lender financing the
energy project, within fourteen days after receiving notice from such
third-party lender that an annual assessment has become delinquent,
record a notice of such lien in the office of the register of deeds of
the county in which the qualifying property is located. The municipality
shall certify the amount of any such delinquency and lien to the county
treasurer, and the lien shall be treated as a special assessment in the
same manner as special assessments are treated under section 77-1858 and
shall be subject to the same collection processes for real estate taxes
and special assessments as set forth in Chapter 77, including, without
limitation, sections 77-1801 to 77-1863.
(b) For qualifying property that is single-family residential
property, all annual assessments imposed on such qualifying property,
including any interest on the annual assessments and any penalty, shall,
upon the initial annual assessment, constitute a PACE lien against the
qualifying property on which the annual assessments are imposed until all
annual assessments, including any interest and penalty, are paid in full.
Any annual assessment that is not paid within the time period set forth
in the assessment contract shall be considered delinquent. The
municipality shall, upon imposition of the initial annual assessment,
-2-

LB1163 LB1163
2026 2026
record a notice of such lien in the office of the register of deeds of
the county in which the qualifying property is located.
(2) A notice of lien filed under this section shall, at a minimum,
include:
(a) The amount of funds disbursed or to be disbursed pursuant to the
assessment contract;
(b) The names and addresses of the current owners of the qualifying
property subject to the annual assessment;
(c) The legal description of the qualifying property subject to the
annual assessment;
(d) The duration of the assessment contract; and
(e) The name and address of the municipality filing the notice of
lien.
(3) The PACE lien created under this section shall:
(a) For qualifying property that is single-family residential
property, (i) be subordinate to all liens on the qualifying property
recorded prior to the time the notice of the PACE lien is recorded, (ii)
be subordinate to a first mortgage or trust deed on the qualifying
property recorded after the notice of the PACE lien is recorded, and
(iii) have priority over any other lien on the qualifying property
recorded after the notice of the PACE lien is recorded; and
(b) For qualifying property other than single-family residential
property and subject to the requirement in subdivision (2)(a) of section
13-3205 to obtain and record an executed consent and subordination
agreement, have the same priority and status as real property tax liens.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the event of a
sale pursuant to a foreclosure or a sale pursuant to the exercise of a
power of sale under a trust deed relating to qualifying property that is
single-family residential property, the holders of any mortgages, trust
deeds, or other liens, including delinquent annual assessments secured by
PACE liens, shall receive proceeds in accordance with the priorities
-3-

LB1163 LB1163
2026 2026
established under subdivision (3)(a) of this section. In the event there
are insufficient proceeds from such a sale, from the loss reserve fund
established pursuant to section 13-3208, or from any other means to
satisfy the delinquent annual assessments, such delinquent annual
assessments shall be extinguished. Any annual assessment that has not yet
become delinquent shall not be accelerated or extinguished in the event
of a sale pursuant to a foreclosure or a sale pursuant to the exercise of
a power of sale under a trust deed relating to qualifying property that
is single-family residential property. Upon the transfer of ownership of
qualifying property that is single-family residential property, including
a sale pursuant to a foreclosure or a sale pursuant to the exercise of a
power of sale under a trust deed, the nondelinquent annual assessments
shall continue as a lien on the qualifying property, subject to the
priorities established under subdivision (3)(a) of this section.
(b) Upon the transfer of ownership of qualifying property other than
single-family residential property, including a sale pursuant to a
foreclosure or a sale pursuant to the exercise of a power of sale under a
trust deed, the obligation to pay annual assessments shall run with the
qualifying property.
(5)(a) For qualifying property other than single-family residential
property, when the delinquent annual assessment, including any interest
and penalty, is paid in full, a release of the PACE lien shall be
recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which
the notice of the PACE lien was recorded.
(b) For qualifying property that is single-family residential
property, when all annual assessments, including any interest and
penalty, are paid in full, a release of the PACE lien shall be recorded
in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the notice
of the PACE lien was recorded.
(6) If the holder or loan servicer of any existing mortgage or trust
deed that encumbers or that is otherwise secured by the qualifying
-4-

LB1163 LB1163
2026 2026
property has established a payment schedule or escrow account to accrue
property taxes or insurance, such holder or loan servicer may increase
the required monthly payment, if any, by an amount necessary to pay the
annual assessment imposed under the Property Assessed Clean Energy Act.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-3206, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-